District of Columbia statutes.
16-919

Proof required on default or admission of defendant.

A decree for a divorce, or a decree annulling a marriage, may not be rendered on default, without proof; and an admission contained in the answer of the defendant may not be taken as proof of the facts charged as the ground of the application, but shall be proved by other evidence in all cases.

Dec. 23, 1963, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1, 77 Stat. 562
1981 Ed., § 16-919.
1973 Ed., § 16-919.